Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2221.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Legislative Findings.
The general assembly finds and declares that eliminating the sale of farmed fur products in
the State of Rhode Island will decrease demand for cruel products, reduce public health risks,
promote community awareness of animal welfare, alleviate environmental burdens, foster a more
humane environment, and enhance the reputation of the state.
SECTION 2. Title 6 of the General Laws entitled "COMMERCIAL LAW — GENERAL
REGULATORY PROVISIONS" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 63
TRADE IN FARMED ANIMAL FUR PRODUCTS ACT
6-63-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as "The Trade In Farmed Animal Fur
Products Act".
6-63-2. Definitions.
As used in this chapter, the following words and phrases shall have the following meanings:
(1) “Fur” means any animal skin or part thereof with hair, fleece, or fur fibers attached
thereto, either in its raw or processed state.
(2) “Fur farm” means any operation, including the land, buildings, support facilities, and
any other location or equipment, in which animals including, but not limited to, mink, fox, raccoon

dog or chinchilla are owned, controlled, raised, bred, propagated, or kept for the value of their fur.
(3)(i) “Fur product” means any article of clothing or covering for any part of the body, or
any fashion accessory including, but not limited to, handbags, shoes, slippers, hats, earmuffs,
scarves, shawls, gloves, jewelry, keychains, toys or trinkets, and home accessories and décor, that
is made, in whole or in part, of fur.
(ii) “Fur product” does not include any of the following:
(A) An animal skin or part thereof that is to be converted into leather, or which in
processing will have the hair, fleece, or fur fiber completely removed;
(B) Animal hair, fleece, or fur fibers that are not attached to skin (e.g., fishing lures); or
(C) Fur, wool, or other fibers sourced exclusively from any member of the family Bovidae,
Camelidae, Equidae, Suidae, or Cervidae;
(4) “Person” means any individual, firm, partnership, joint venture, association, limited
liability company, corporation, estate, trust, receiver, or syndicate.
(5) “Ultimate consumer” means an individual who buys a fur product for their own use, or
for the use of another, but not for resale or trade.
(6) “Used fur product” means a fur product that has been worn or used by an ultimate
consumer.
6-63-3. Prohibitions.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, it is unlawful for any person to sell, offer for
sale, display for sale, trade, or otherwise distribute for monetary or nonmonetary consideration, a
fur product in the State of Rhode Island if any of the fur contained in the fur product was sourced
from an animal that was raised, maintained, kept, or housed for all or part of its life on a fur farm.
For purposes of this section, the sale of a fur product shall be deemed to occur in the State of Rhode
Island if:
(1) The buyer takes physical possession of the fur product in Rhode Island; or
(2) The seller is located in Rhode Island.
6-63-4. Exemptions.
The prohibitions set forth in § 6-63-3 shall not apply to the sale, offer for sale, display for
sale, trade, or distribution of:
(1) A used fur product; or
(2) A fur product where the activity is expressly authorized by federal law.
6-63-5. Civil Penalty.
(a) A violation of this chapter shall be a civil infraction. Any person who violates this
chapter shall be subject to the following penalties:
LC004252 - Page 2 of 4

(1) For a first violation, a civil penalty of up to five hundred dollars ($500);
(2) For a second violation that occurred within one year of a previous civil infraction, a
civil penalty of up to seven hundred fifty dollars ($750); and
(3) For a third violation that occurred within one year of a second civil infraction, a civil
penalty of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000).
(b) Each fur product that constitutes a violation of this chapter shall be treated as a separate
violation in any civil action brought pursuant to this chapter.
6-63-6. Enforcement.
(a) The attorney general shall enforce the provisions of this chapter. The attorney general
may also seek injunctive relief to prevent further violations of this chapter.
(b) Within six (6) months of the effective date of this chapter, the attorney general shall
promulgate rules and regulations for the implementation and enforcement of this chapter.
(3) Any municipality may, by ordinance, enforce the provisions of § 6-63-5.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, there shall be a rebuttable presumption
that a fur product contains fur that was sourced from an animal raised, maintained, kept, or housed
for all or part of its life on a fur farm.
6-63-7 Severability.
If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is
held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect any other provision or application which can be given
effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are
declared to be severable.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect three (3) years after passage.
========
LC004252
========
LC004252 - Page 3 of 4